Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1563
Modular housing unit; violation; penalty.

(1) Any person who manufactures, sells, offers for sale, or leases in this state any modular housing unit which does not bear the seal required by the provisions of the Nebraska Uniform Standards for Modular Housing Units Act shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor.

(2) The commission may, in accordance with the laws governing injunctions and other processes, maintain an action in the name of the state against any person who manufactures, sells, offers for sale, or leases in this state any modular housing unit which does not bear the seal required by the provisions of such act.

(3) The commission may administratively fine pursuant to section 75-156 any person who violates the act or any rule or regulation adopted and promulgated under the act.

Laws 1976, LB 248, § 9;

Laws 1977, LB 41, § 60;

Laws 1984, LB 822, § 9;

Laws 1998, LB 1073, § 97;

Laws 2008, LB797, § 9.